Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,133
Immunities, rights, and privileges.

Limited cooperative associations have the same immunities, rights, and privileges provided other types of associations formed under other laws of this state and shall be exempt from those laws to the same extent, but only to the same extent, as those entities organized under the Nonstock Cooperative Marketing Act or sections 21-1301 to 21-1339 are exempt.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 133.

Nonstock Cooperative Marketing Act, see section 21-1401.